Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 1

County Budgeting Law of 1957

5-12-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “County Budgeting Law of 1957.”

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1201.

Cross-References. County financial management system, title 5, ch. 21.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to sheriff's department expenditures, OAG 98-010, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/9/98).

5-12-102. Local approval — Form.

This part shall be local in effect and shall become effective in a particular county upon the contingency of a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body or other governing body of the county approving this law, or upon the contingency of the majority of the voters casting votes in any election held for this purpose approving this law.

The procedure for elections held for the purpose of approving this law shall be that the county election commission shall call and conduct an election within thirty (30) days after receiving a petition signed by ten percent (10%) of the qualified voters of the county, stating that they favor this law and requesting that an election be held in the county on the subject.

The number of qualified voters in the county is deemed to be the total number of votes cast for all candidates for governor in the last general election, or upon a resolution of the county legislative body or other governing body, duly certified to the election commission, requesting such an election.

In such an election, the propositions to be voted upon shall be stated on the ballot on separate lines in the following manner: “For the County Budgeting Law of 1957” and “Against the County Budgeting Law of 1957.”

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1202.

5-12-103. Local approval — Effect.

Any county that adopts this law, or the budgeting system provided for in this part, in accordance with § 5-12-102, shall follow the general procedures set forth in this part in the preparation, adoption and execution of all budgets respecting all funds, activities and agencies of county government.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 3; T.C.A., § 5-1203.

5-12-104. Budget committee.

A county budget committee is hereby created.

Except as provided in subsection (e), the committee shall consist of five (5) members, one (1) of whom shall be the county mayor, and the other four (4) shall be appointed by the county mayor with the approval of the county governing body at its regular January session of each year or at any subsequent session.

The members of the committee need not be members of the county governing body.

The county mayor shall be the ex officio chair of the budget committee, and the director of accounts and budgets shall be the ex officio secretary of the budget committee.

The county governing body may in its discretion allow members of the budget committee such compensation for their service as the commission may deem proper.

Any provision for compensation, as well as provision for printing, publicity, supplies and other necessary expenses of the budget committee, shall be payable from the county general fund and shall be included in the annual appropriations.

The budget committee shall perform all the duties respecting county budgets and appropriations now performed, or required to be performed, by the finance committee, tax levy committee or other committees of the county, and shall perform such other duties as provided in this part.

In any county having a population of not less than one hundred fifty-six thousand eight hundred (156,800) nor more than one hundred fifty-six thousand nine hundred (156,900), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the committee shall consist of not more than nine (9) nor less than five (5) members, one (1) of whom shall be the county mayor. The other members shall be appointed by the county mayor with the approval of the county governing body at its regular January session of each year or at any subsequent session. The number of members shall be determined annually by the legislative body of the county.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1204; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2013, ch. 237, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 45-2-405 authorizes any officer, director, or employee of any bank to serve in any local office, including on the county commission, the county budget committee, or the county purchasing commission, so long as he or she discloses the position to the bank and the local government, OAG 07-141, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 141 (10/10/07).

A shareholder of a bank that conducts business with the county is prohibited from serving as a county commissioner, or as a member of the county budget committee or the county purchasing commission, OAG 07-141, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 141 (10/10/07).

5-12-105. Fiscal year — Timeline and budgetary process for LEA.

There is hereby created a fiscal year for the counties and for each office, department, institution, activity and agency thereof, which fiscal year shall begin on July 1 of each year and shall end on June 30 next following.

The fiscal year shall constitute the budget year, and the year for accounting and reporting of each and every fund, office, department, institution, activity and agency of the county government; but this subsection (b) shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any accounting and reporting now required of any official by general law.

If the county legislative body adopts a timeline and budgetary procedures for the county, then the estimates and budget proposals provided for in § 5-12-106 shall be filed in accordance with that timeline; provided, however, the timeline for the budget of the local education agency (LEA) shall be established by the county legislative body with the concurrence of the county board of education.

In the absence of a locally adopted schedule and procedures pursuant to subsection (c), the budgetary procedures for the county shall follow the following timeline:

No later than February 1, the director of accounts and budgets shall deliver forms for all budget requests to all departments, commissions, institutions, boards, offices, and agencies;

No later than March 1, all departments, commissions, institutions, boards, offices, and agencies except the local board of education shall deliver the appropriate estimates and budget request to the director of accounts and budgets;

No later than April 1, the county budget committee shall vote upon the proposed budget and the director of accounts and budgets shall notify the department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency whether the county budget committee approves or rejects the proposed budget;

If approved, the director of accounts and budgets shall immediately forward the proposed budget to the county legislative body for consideration; or

If rejected, the department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency shall submit a revised budget proposal to the director of accounts and budgets within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice that the budget proposal was rejected.

No later than May 1, each LEA shall submit a proposed budget to the director of accounts and budgets; provided that, the LEA may amend the proposed budget after May 1;

No later than June 1, the county budget committee shall vote upon the proposed budget and the director of accounts and budgets shall notify the LEA whether the county budget committee approves or rejects the LEA's proposed budget;

If approved, the director of accounts and budgets shall immediately forward the proposed budget to the county legislative body for consideration; or

If rejected, the LEA shall submit a revised budget proposal to the director of accounts and budgets within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice that the budget proposal was rejected;

If the county budget committee of the local governing body rejects the first and second budget proposals from any department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency, then the third and any subsequent proposals shall be delivered directly to the county legislative body which shall approve or reject the proposal within ten (10) business days of the body's receipt of the amended proposal; and

If rejected, the department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency shall submit a revised budget proposal to the county legislative body within ten (10) business days after receipt of notice that the budget proposal was rejected.

The timeline and budgetary process pursuant to this section may be waived or altered, if agreed upon by the county legislative body and the respective department, commission, institution, board, office, or agency.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 5; T.C.A., § 5-1205; Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 4.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (c)-(e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. January 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Fiscal year of county, § 9-1-101.

5-12-106. Budget estimates.

The county highway commissioners or superintendent shall, in accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-12-105, file with the director of accounts and budgets an itemized statement of the funds estimated to be required for the county road program for the ensuing fiscal year and for the construction, operation, repair and maintenance of the county road system and for the general administration of the highway department, together with an estimate of the highway and road funds expected to be received during such fiscal year.

The county board of education, after preparing its annual budget as now provided by law, shall file such budget with the director of accounts and budgets for inclusion in the complete budget document to be presented to the budget committee.

The county mayor, in accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-12-105, shall file with the director of accounts and budgets an itemized statement of the amounts that the county mayor estimates are necessary to be expended from the county general fund, the debt service funds and from all other funds, excluding highway funds, school funds, and funds derived from the sale of bonds, together with an estimate of the revenue to be received during the next fiscal year.

Each of the other operating departments, institutions, offices and agencies shall file with the director of accounts and budgets in accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-12-105 a detailed estimate of its requirements for expenditures from the county's funds for the ensuing fiscal year, together with an estimate of any county revenues to be received by such agency, office or department.

The director of accounts and budgets shall file a consolidated budget document with the budget committee showing an itemized statement of the amounts estimated by the various departments and officials to be required for the efficient operation of the county government from the county general fund, the debt service funds, highway funds, school funds and all other funds, together with an estimate of the revenues estimated to be received by each of the funds during the next fiscal year and an estimate of the unencumbered cash balance of each of the funds at the beginning of the fiscal year.

It is the duty of each official, office, department, institution, agent or employee of the county government to furnish in writing such information, in such form and at such time, as may be requested by the budget committee.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1206; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; Acts 2016, ch. 1080, §§ 5, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, substituted “in accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-12-105” for “on or before April 1 of each year” in (a), (c) and (d); and deleted “, on or before May 1 of each year,” preceding “shall file” near the beginning of (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. January 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Application to school funds, superintendents and boards of education, § 5-12-113.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-12-107. Committee action on budget.

In accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-12-105, the budget committee shall review and adopt the annual budget.

The budget shall contain an itemized and classified plan of all proposed expenditures and estimated receipts for the ensuing fiscal year, and shall conform to the uniform classification of accounts established by the director of accounts and budgets.

The classification of accounts must be first approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

It is expressly provided that the classification of expenditures and receipts of any and all county school funds for any purpose, administered by the county board of education and the county director of schools shall conform in all respects to the classification of accounts as prescribed by the commissioner of education.

Opposite each item of estimated revenue, the budget document shall show in opposite parallel columns the amount actually collected for the last completed fiscal year, a revised estimated amount for the current fiscal year, and the estimate for the ensuing fiscal year.

Likewise, opposite each item of proposed expenditure, the budget document shall show the amount actually expended for such item during the last completed year, the probable amount that will be spent during the current fiscal year and the proposed appropriations or expenditure estimate for the ensuing fiscal year.

In preparing the budget, the budget committee may revise, as it deems necessary, the estimates or requests made by the various departments, officials, offices, institutions and agencies of the county, but any county official or employee shall be entitled to a hearing before the budget committee with reference to any contemplated changes in the county official's or employee's budget requests or estimates.

The budget committee shall certainly and fully provide in the budget for all requirements for debt service, interest and bond maturities and for any cash deficit in any fund at the beginning of the fiscal year, and shall propose a tentative tax rate for the current calendar year.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 7; 1961, ch. 277, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1207; Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 7.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, substituted “In accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-12-105” for “At least forty-five (45) days prior to the beginning of each fiscal year” at the beginning of (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. January 1, 2017.

5-12-108. Budget proposal — Public comment — Committee revisions.

At least ten (10) days before the budget committee conducts a public hearing as provided in subdivision (a)(3), the budget committee shall cause the proposed annual operating budget to be published in a newspaper of general circulation.

This budget shall contain a budgetary comparison for the following governmental funds:

General;

Highway/public works;

General purpose school fund; and

Debt service

that shall include comparisons of the proposed budget with the current year and the prior year.

The budgetary comparisons shall be by individual fund and shall summarize revenues by local taxes, state of Tennessee, federal government and other sources. Expenditures shall be summarized by salaries and other costs. The budgetary comparison shall also present beginning and ending fund balances and the number of employee positions.

The publication shall also contain a notice of a public hearing to be conducted by the budget committee at which any citizen of the county shall have the right to appear and state such citizen's views on the budget.

Such public hearing shall be held by the budget committee not later than ten (10) days prior to the beginning of the fiscal year.

Following such public hearing, the budget committee shall make the final revision of the budget document and prepare copies for presentation to the county governing body.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 8; 1967, ch. 390, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-1208; Acts 1991, ch. 484, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. The budget committee is not required to answer questions posed by citizens who attend the hearing required by the statute, OAG 01-061, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (4/19/01).

5-12-109. County governing body action on budget.

The budget committee shall present the budget to the county governing body in accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-12-105.

The proposed budget shall be accompanied by a budget message explaining the financial program and outlining the services, work and activities to be financed by the proposed budget and a brief discussion of the means proposed for financing the expenditure program set forth in the budget.

With the proposed budget, the budget committee shall deliver to the county governing body a budget appropriation resolution and a tax levy resolution.

The county legislative body may alter or revise the proposed budget except as to provision for debt service requirements and for other expenditures required by law.

In the event that the local fiscal body has not adopted a budget by July 1 of any year, and until a final operating budget is adopted, the operating budget for the year just ended and the appropriation resolution for the year shall continue in effect by operation of law without further action of the county legislative body; provided, however, all agencies of the county and other entities receiving appropriated county funds shall not during any month encumber funds in excess of the allotment for a comparable month of the preceding fiscal year, unless specifically authorized to do so by resolution of the county legislative body. The authorizing resolution must identify a corresponding funding source equal to the amount of excess allotment authorized. The excess allotments so authorized shall become a part of the final operating budget. During the time that the continuation operating budget is in effect, the budget may be amended according to the procedures for amending a final operating budget, and amendments shall be made as necessary to provide for debt obligations and court-ordered expenditures.

The continuing budget authorized by this subsection (b) may continue in effect for the months of July and August and, upon approval from the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee after a showing of extraordinary circumstances, may continue for the month of September; provided, however, no such continuation budget may extend beyond September 30 of any fiscal year. The county shall submit justification for extending the continuing budget through the month of September to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for approval by August 15. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may request any additional information as may be required to properly review the continuing budget extension request. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall report the comptroller's approval or disapproval to the county legislative body within seven (7) business days, after receipt of the request and any requested supplemental documentation, upon which the county legislative body may take action to extend the continuing budget for the month of September. The fact that the county is operating under a continuation budget shall not, by itself, be grounds for disapproval of a tax and revenue anticipation note or other comparable financing.

If the county legislative body and the county school board fail to agree upon a budget for the county department of education by August 31 of any year, then, by operation of law, the budget for the county department of education shall be equal to the minimum budget required to comply with the local match and maintenance of effort provisions of the BEP. However, if for three (3) consecutive years, the county legislative body and school board fail to agree upon a budget and the department of education receives the minimum required funding for that fiscal year by operation of law, then, the budget in the third year shall include a mandatory increase that is equivalent to three percent (3%) of the required funding from local sources for schools; provided, however, this increase shall not be required if during any of those three (3) years the school board failed to submit its budget proposals in accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-12-105.

The budget, the appropriation resolution, and the tax levy resolution, as adopted, shall be spread upon the minutes of the county governing body.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 9; T.C.A., § 5-1209; Acts 2015, ch. 170, § 2; 2016, ch. 1080, §§ 8, 9.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (b), which read: “(b)(1) The county governing body may alter or revise the proposed budget except as to provision for debt service requirements and for other expenditures required by law, but the county governing body shall finally adopt a budget not later than the third Monday in July. (2) Pending such final adoption, the director of accounts and budgets is hereby authorized to make temporary allotments for expenditures for essential county services, in amounts not in excess of the comparable allotment for an average quarter of the preceding fiscal year.”

The 2016 amendment, effective May 20, 2016, added (c) and redesignated former (c) to be present (d).

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, substituted “in accordance with a timeline provided for in § 5-12-105” for “at the regular July session each year or at a special session called for this purpose during the month of July” in (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 170, § 5. April 16, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 1080, § 18. May 20, 2016; January 1, 2017.

5-12-110. Expenditures — Limitations and restrictions — Disbursement warrants.

The appropriations made in the appropriation resolution, or any amendment thereto, shall constitute the limit to expenditures for the various purposes and from the several funds of such county for the fiscal year covered by the resolution, and no expenditure shall be made or obligation created in excess of such limitation.

Any resolution presented to the county legislative body or other governing body in any fiscal year, after the original appropriation resolution has been adopted and the tax rate for the year fixed by that body, that provides for an appropriation in addition to those made in the original budget appropriation resolution, shall specifically provide sufficient revenue or other funds to meet expenditures to be made in consequence of such additional appropriation.

If at any time during the fiscal year it shall become apparent that the revenues of any of the county's funds, together with its unencumbered cash balance at the beginning of such year, will not be sufficient to equal the amount of the original appropriations, it shall be the duty of the director of accounts and budgets and the county mayor to impound the appropriations from such fund in such amount as shall appear necessary, subject to the written approval of the budget committee.

The appropriations made by the county legislative body or other governing body, as provided in subsections (a) through (c), shall constitute authorization for expenditures; and expenditures may be made and obligations created against any appropriation to an aggregate total of the amount appropriated for such item.

However, the expenditures and encumbrances against the amounts appropriated shall be made only in consequence of an order issued by the purchasing agent and subsequent approval of the invoice by the director of accounts and budgets; except that payrolls and bills for telephones, water, gas, electric and other utility services shall first be checked and approved for payment by the various departments or otherwise as provided by law, and county obligations imposed by law shall be approved by the proper authority before being submitted to the director of accounts and budgets for payment.

No expenditures made or obligations created in any manner other than so specified or authorized in this part shall be valid or binding against the county; provided, that the purchasing commission may issue such regulations as it deems necessary for the prompt handling of bona fide emergencies.

Accounts and other obligations of the county department of education, other than payrolls, after preaudit by the director of accounts and budgets, shall be paid by disbursement warrants drawn on the county trustee by the county board of education, but copies of all disbursement warrants issued by the board of education, showing the accounting classification chargeable, shall be furnished by the board of education to the director of accounts and budgets daily as issued. In lieu of such requirement, such disbursement warrants may be prepared in the office of the director of accounts and budgets for the county board of education.

Expenditures from all other funds of the county, except school funds, shall be made by disbursement warrants on the county trustee signed by the county mayor and the director of accounts and budgets, and no other official, department, institution or agency of the county shall issue negotiable warrants or vouchers for such expenditures.

Before any disbursement warrant shall be issued in discharge of any obligation, a detailed invoice or statement thereof shall be filed with the director of accounts and budgets, and it shall be the director's duty to carefully check all such invoices to determine if they are correct, if the goods or services have been received or rendered as stated, and if the obligation is just, authorized or legally binding on the county.

Bills and accounts incurred in accordance with authorized appropriations shall be paid promptly in order that the county may obtain the benefit of cash discounts; and for this purpose, it shall not be necessary for any such bill or account to be filed and recorded by the county clerk or to be approved before payment by the county legislative body or by any committee or commission appointed by it.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 10; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 22, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1210; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Application to school funds, superintendents and boards of education, § 5-12-113.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State and County Securities, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to sheriff's department expenditures, OAG 98-010, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/9/98).

5-12-111. Monthly report of director.

The director of accounts and budgets shall make a report at the end of each month showing the condition of the budget.

The report shall show for each item of appropriation, or allotment of each item of appropriation, or both, the total expenditures for the month and the year to date, the amount of outstanding encumbrances and the amount of the unencumbered balance.

The report shall also show for each fund an itemized statement of the revenues and receipts estimated for the year, the amount of the collections of each item for the month and the year to date and the unrealized portion of the estimate.

In a parallel column shall be shown the amount of each item or revenue during the comparable elapsed period of the preceding fiscal year.

The most recent of such reports shall be presented by the county mayor at each regular session of the county legislative body or other governing body.

At such time, the county mayor shall advise the county governing body of the condition of the budget, and of any adjustment or reduction of appropriations that should be made, and shall recommend any other action that, in the county mayor's opinion, the county governing body should take in order that the budget shall be kept in balance.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 5-1211; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-12-112. Violations — Penalties.

Any official or employee of the county, or of any institution or agency thereof, who fails or refuses to perform the duties required of that official or employee by this part, or who fails or refuses otherwise to conform to this part, commits a Class C misdemeanor and is subject to removal from that official's or employee's position.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 12; T.C.A., § 5-1212; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to sheriff's department expenditures, OAG 98-010, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/9/98).

5-12-113. Application to schools, etc.

This part shall not apply to county school funds for any purpose, the county board of education, and the county director of schools unless approved by the commissioner of education.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 12a; T.C.A., § 5-1213.

5-12-114. Construction of part.

It is not the intent of this part to repeal or supersede any private or local law concerning budgeting systems.

This part is not exclusive and shall not prevent the adoption of amendments to existing special or local laws pertaining to county budgeting systems, or the enactment of special or local budgeting systems.

Acts 1957, ch. 291, § 13; T.C.A., § 5-1214.